Utah statutes.
70A-2-403.   Power to transfer -- Good faith purchase of goods -- Definition
of entrusting.
(1)  A purchaser of goods acquires all title which his transferor had or had
power to transfer except that a purchaser of a limited interest acquires
rights only to the extent of the interest purchased.  A person with voidable
title has power to transfer a good title to a good faith purchaser for value.
When goods have been delivered under a transaction of purchase the purchaser
has such power even though:
(a)  the transferor was deceived as to the identity of the purchaser;
(b)  the delivery was in exchange for a check which is later dishonored;
(c)  it was agreed that the transaction was to be a "cash sale"; or
(d)  the delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under the
criminal law.
(2)  Any entrusting of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of
that kind gives him power to transfer all rights of the entruster to a buyer
in ordinary course of business.
(3)  "Entrusting" includes any delivery and any acquiescence in retention of
possession regardless of any condition expressed between the parties to the
delivery or acquiescence and regardless of whether the procurement of the
entrusting or the possessor's disposition of the goods have been such as to be
larcenous under the criminal law.
(4)  The rights of other purchasers of goods and of lien creditors are
governed by Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code - Secured Transactions and
Chapter 7a, Uniform Commercial Code - Documents of Title.
